Utah statutes.
34A-2-1004.   Information required to obtain a waiver.

To obtain or renew a waiver, a business entity shall submit to the commission:

(1)  a copy of two or more of the following:

(a)  the business entity's federal or state income tax return that shows business income for the complete taxable year that immediately precedes the day on which the business entity submits the information;

(b)  a valid business license;

(c)  a license to engage in an occupation or profession, including a license under Title 58, Occupations and Professions; or

(d)  documentation of an active liability insurance policy that covers the business entity's activities; or

(2)  a copy of one item listed in Subsection (1) and a copy of two or more of the following:

(a)  proof of a bank account for the business entity;

(b)  proof that for the business entity there is:

(i)  a telephone number; and

(ii)  a physical location; or

(c)  an advertisement of services in a newspaper of general circulation or telephone directory showing the business entity's:

(i)  name; and

(ii)  contact information.

